Illinois, session 104th, SB939.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 510-22.6 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.6)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-22.6)7    Sec. 10-22.6. Suspension or expulsion of students; school 8searches. 9    (a) To expel students guilty of gross disobedience or 10misconduct, including gross disobedience or misconduct 11perpetuated by electronic means, pursuant to subsection (b-20) 12of this Section, and no action shall lie against them for such 13expulsion. Expulsion shall take place only after the parents 14or guardians have been requested to appear at a meeting of the 15board, or with a hearing officer appointed by it, to discuss 16their child's behavior. Such request shall be made by 17registered or certified mail and shall state the time, place 18and purpose of the meeting. The board, or a hearing officer 19appointed by it, at such meeting shall state the reasons for 20dismissal and the date on which the expulsion is to become 21effective. If a hearing officer is appointed by the board, the 22hearing officer shall report to the board a written summary of 23the evidence heard at the meeting and the board may take such   SB0939 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 05246 LNS 15275 b1action thereon as it finds appropriate. If the board acts to 2expel a student, the written expulsion decision shall detail 3the specific reasons why removing the student from the 4learning environment is in the best interest of the school. 5The expulsion decision shall also include a rationale as to 6the specific duration of the expulsion. An expelled student 7may be immediately transferred to an alternative program in 8the manner provided in Article 13A or 13B of this Code. A 9student must not be denied transfer because of the expulsion, 10except in cases in which such transfer is deemed to cause a 11threat to the safety of students or staff in the alternative 12program. 13    (b) To suspend or by policy to authorize the 14superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 15principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend 16students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct, or to 17suspend students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct on 18the school bus from riding the school bus, pursuant to 19subsections (b-15) and (b-20) of this Section, and no action 20shall lie against them for such suspension. The board may by 21policy authorize the superintendent of the district or the 22principal, assistant principal, or dean of students of any 23school to suspend students guilty of such acts for a period not 24to exceed 10 school days. If a student is suspended due to 25gross disobedience or misconduct on a school bus, the board 26may suspend the student in excess of 10 school days for safety   SB0939 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 05246 LNS 15275 b1reasons. 2    Any suspension shall be reported immediately to the 3parents or guardians of a student along with a full statement 4of the reasons for such suspension and a notice of their right 5to a review. The school board must be given a summary of the 6notice, including the reason for the suspension and the 7suspension length. Upon request of the parents or guardians, 8the school board or a hearing officer appointed by it shall 9review such action of the superintendent or principal, 10assistant principal, or dean of students. At such review, the 11parents or guardians of the student may appear and discuss the 12suspension with the board or its hearing officer. If a hearing 13officer is appointed by the board, he shall report to the board 14a written summary of the evidence heard at the meeting. After 15its hearing or upon receipt of the written report of its 16hearing officer, the board may take such action as it finds 17appropriate. If a student is suspended pursuant to this 18subsection (b), the board shall, in the written suspension 19decision, detail the specific act of gross disobedience or 20misconduct resulting in the decision to suspend. The 21suspension decision shall also include a rationale as to the 22specific duration of the suspension.23    (b-5) Among the many possible disciplinary interventions 24and consequences available to school officials, school 25exclusions, such as out-of-school suspensions and expulsions, 26are the most serious. School officials shall limit the number   SB0939 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 05246 LNS 15275 b1and duration of expulsions and suspensions to the greatest 2extent practicable, and it is recommended that they use them 3only for legitimate educational purposes. To ensure that 4students are not excluded from school unnecessarily, it is 5recommended that school officials consider forms of 6non-exclusionary discipline prior to using out-of-school 7suspensions or expulsions. 8    (b-10) Unless otherwise required by federal law or this 9Code, school boards may not institute zero-tolerance policies 10by which school administrators are required to suspend or 11expel students for particular behaviors.12    (b-15) Out-of-school suspensions of 3 days or less may be 13used only if the student's continuing presence in school would 14pose a threat to school safety or a disruption to other 15students' learning opportunities. For purposes of this 16subsection (b-15), "threat to school safety or a disruption to 17other students' learning opportunities" shall be determined on 18a case-by-case basis by the school board or its designee. 19School officials shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve 20such threats, address such disruptions, and minimize the 21length of suspensions to the greatest extent practicable.22    (b-20) Unless otherwise required by this Code, 23out-of-school suspensions of longer than 3 days, expulsions, 24and disciplinary removals to alternative schools may be used 25only if other appropriate and available behavioral and 26disciplinary interventions have been exhausted and the   SB0939 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 05246 LNS 15275 b1student's continuing presence in school would either (i) pose 2a threat to the safety of other students, staff, or members of 3the school community or (ii) substantially disrupt, impede, or 4interfere with the operation of the school. For purposes of 5this subsection (b-20), "threat to the safety of other 6students, staff, or members of the school community" and 7"substantially disrupt, impede, or interfere with the 8operation of the school" shall be determined on a case-by-case 9basis by school officials. For purposes of this subsection 10(b-20), the determination of whether "appropriate and 11available behavioral and disciplinary interventions have been 12exhausted" shall be made by school officials. School officials 13shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve such threats, 14address such disruptions, and minimize the length of student 15exclusions to the greatest extent practicable. Within the 16suspension decision described in subsection (b) of this 17Section or the expulsion decision described in subsection (a) 18of this Section, it shall be documented whether other 19interventions were attempted or whether it was determined that 20there were no other appropriate and available interventions.21    (b-25) Students who are suspended out-of-school for longer 22than 3 school days shall be provided appropriate and available 23support services during the period of their suspension. For 24purposes of this subsection (b-25), "appropriate and available 25support services" shall be determined by school authorities. 26Within the suspension decision described in subsection (b) of   SB0939 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 05246 LNS 15275 b1this Section, it shall be documented whether such services are 2to be provided or whether it was determined that there are no 3such appropriate and available services. 4    A school district may refer students who are expelled to 5appropriate and available support services.6    A school district shall create a policy to facilitate the 7re-engagement of students who are suspended out-of-school, 8expelled, or returning from an alternative school setting. In 9consultation with stakeholders deemed appropriate by the State 10Board of Education, the State Board of Education shall draft 11and publish guidance for the re-engagement of students who are 12suspended out-of-school, expelled, or returning from an 13alternative school setting in accordance with this Section and 14Section 13A-4 on or before July 1, 2025. 15    (b-30) A school district shall create a policy by which 16suspended students, including those students suspended from 17the school bus who do not have alternate transportation to 18school, shall have the opportunity to make up work for 19equivalent academic credit. It shall be the responsibility of 20a student's parents or guardians to notify school officials 21that a student suspended from the school bus does not have 22alternate transportation to school. 23    (b-35) In all suspension review hearings conducted under 24subsection (b) or expulsion hearings conducted under 25subsection (a), a student may disclose any factor to be 26considered in mitigation, including his or her status as a   SB0939 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 05246 LNS 15275 b1parent, expectant parent, or victim of domestic or sexual 2violence, as defined in Article 26A. A representative of the 3parent's or guardian's choice, or of the student's choice if 4emancipated, must be permitted to represent the student 5throughout the proceedings and to address the school board or 6its appointed hearing officer. With the approval of the 7student's parent or guardian, or of the student if 8emancipated, a support person must be permitted to accompany 9the student to any disciplinary hearings or proceedings. The 10representative or support person must comply with any rules of 11the school district's hearing process. If the representative 12or support person violates the rules or engages in behavior or 13advocacy that harasses, abuses, or intimidates either party, a 14witness, or anyone else in attendance at the hearing, the 15representative or support person may be prohibited from 16further participation in the hearing or proceeding. A 17suspension or expulsion proceeding under this subsection 18(b-35) must be conducted independently from any ongoing 19criminal investigation or proceeding, and an absence of 20pending or possible criminal charges, criminal investigations, 21or proceedings may not be a factor in school disciplinary 22decisions.23    (b-40) During a suspension review hearing conducted under 24subsection (b) or an expulsion hearing conducted under 25subsection (a) that involves allegations of sexual violence by 26the student who is subject to discipline, neither the student   SB0939 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 05246 LNS 15275 b1nor his or her representative shall directly question nor have 2direct contact with the alleged victim. The student who is 3subject to discipline or his or her representative may, at the 4discretion and direction of the school board or its appointed 5hearing officer, suggest questions to be posed by the school 6board or its appointed hearing officer to the alleged victim. 7    (c) A school board must invite a representative from a 8local mental health agency to consult with the board at the 9meeting whenever there is evidence that mental illness may be 10the cause of a student's expulsion or suspension.11    (c-5) School districts shall make reasonable efforts to 12provide ongoing professional development to all school 13personnel, school board members, and school resource officers 14on the requirements of this Section and Section 10-20.14, the 15adverse consequences of school exclusion and justice-system 16involvement, effective classroom management strategies, 17culturally responsive discipline, trauma-responsive learning 18environments, as defined in subsection (b) of Section 3-11, 19the appropriate and available supportive services for the 20promotion of student attendance and engagement, and 21developmentally appropriate disciplinary methods that promote 22positive and healthy school climates. 23    (d) The board may expel a student for a definite period of 24time not to exceed 2 calendar years, as determined on a 25case-by-case basis. A student who is determined to have 26brought one of the following objects to school, any   SB0939 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 05246 LNS 15275 b1school-sponsored activity or event, or any activity or event 2that bears a reasonable relationship to school shall be 3expelled for a period of not less than one year:4        (1) A firearm. For the purposes of this Section, 5    "firearm" means any gun, rifle, shotgun, weapon as defined 6    by Section 921 of Title 18 of the United States Code, 7    firearm as defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 8    Identification Card Act, or firearm as defined in Section 9    24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. The expulsion period 10    under this subdivision (1) may be modified by the 11    superintendent, and the superintendent's determination may 12    be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis.13        (2) A knife, brass knuckles or other knuckle weapon 14    regardless of its composition, a billy club, or any other 15    object if used or attempted to be used to cause bodily 16    harm, including "look alikes" of any firearm as defined in 17    subdivision (1) of this subsection (d). The expulsion 18    requirement under this subdivision (2) may be modified by 19    the superintendent, and the superintendent's determination 20    may be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis. 21Expulsion or suspension shall be construed in a manner 22consistent with the federal Individuals with Disabilities 23Education Act. A student who is subject to suspension or 24expulsion as provided in this Section may be eligible for a 25transfer to an alternative school program in accordance with 26Article 13A of the School Code.  SB0939 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 05246 LNS 15275 b1    (d-5) The board may suspend or by regulation authorize the 2superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 3principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend a 4student for a period not to exceed 10 school days or may expel 5a student for a definite period of time not to exceed 2 6calendar years, as determined on a case-by-case basis, if (i) 7that student has been determined to have made an explicit 8threat on an Internet website against a school employee, a 9student, or any school-related personnel, (ii) the Internet 10website through which the threat was made is a site that was 11accessible within the school at the time the threat was made or 12was available to third parties who worked or studied within 13the school grounds at the time the threat was made, and (iii) 14the threat could be reasonably interpreted as threatening to 15the safety and security of the threatened individual because 16of the individual's duties or employment status or status as a 17student inside the school. 18    (d-10) A student who is determined to have initiated a 19sexual assault or an attempted sexual assault, at a school, a 20school-sponsored activity or event, or an activity or event 21that bears a reasonable relationship to school, against a 22student victim and without the student victim's consent shall 23be expelled for a period of not less than one year. 24    A student who is determined to have initiated sexual 25conduct, at a school, a school-sponsored activity or event, or 26an activity or event that bears a reasonable relationship to   SB0939 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 05246 LNS 15275 b1school, against a student victim, without the student victim's 2consent shall be expelled for a period of not less than 6 3months.4        (1) A student initiates sexual conduct if the student 5    uses force or a threat of force to make the student victim 6    perform a nonconsensual sexual act. 7        (2) A student initiates a sexual assault if the 8    student uses force or threat of force and commits an act of 9    sexual penetration on the student victim. 10        (3) A student initiates an attempted sexual assault 11    if, with the intent to commit a sexual assault under 12    paragraph (2), the student commits an act that constitutes 13    a substantial step toward the commission of a sexual 14    assault under paragraph (2). 15        (4) An act is committed without the student victim's 16    consent if the student victim does not freely agree to 17    participate in the sexual act or is unable to give knowing 18    consent because the student victim is unconscious, asleep, 19    or unaware that the act is occurring; if the student 20    victim is impaired by intoxication or drugs; or if the 21    student victim lacks capacity to consent due to a 22    disability. 23        (5) The expulsion requirement in this subsection 24    (d-10) may be modified by the superintendent, and the 25    superintendent's determination may be modified by the 26    board on a case-by-case basis. In reviewing whether to   SB0939 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 05246 LNS 15275 b1    modify an expulsion under this subsection, the hearing 2    officer, superintendent, and board shall consider whether 3    the student was unable to understand the nature of the 4    student's conduct because of age or disability. Expulsion 5    under this subsection (d-10) shall be construed in a 6    manner consistent with the federal Individuals with 7    Disabilities Education Act and Title IX of the federal 8    Education Amendments of 1972. 9        (6) Expulsion under this subsection (d-10) shall 10    comply with the expulsion procedures set forth in 11    subsection (a). 12        (7) A student who is subject to expulsion as provided 13    in this subsection (d-10) may be eligible for a transfer 14    to an alternative school program in accordance with 15    Article 13A of this Code. 16    As used in this subsection (d-10), "sexual conduct" and 17"sexual penetration" have the meanings given to those terms in 18Section 11-0.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 19    (e) To maintain order and security in the schools, school 20authorities may inspect and search places and areas such as 21lockers, desks, parking lots, and other school property and 22equipment owned or controlled by the school, as well as 23personal effects left in those places and areas by students, 24without notice to or the consent of the student, and without a 25search warrant. As a matter of public policy, the General 26Assembly finds that students have no reasonable expectation of   SB0939 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 05246 LNS 15275 b1privacy in these places and areas or in their personal effects 2left in these places and areas. School authorities may request 3the assistance of law enforcement officials for the purpose of 4conducting inspections and searches of lockers, desks, parking 5lots, and other school property and equipment owned or 6controlled by the school for illegal drugs, weapons, or other 7illegal or dangerous substances or materials, including 8searches conducted through the use of specially trained dogs. 9If a search conducted in accordance with this Section produces 10evidence that the student has violated or is violating either 11the law, local ordinance, or the school's policies or rules, 12such evidence may be seized by school authorities, and 13disciplinary action may be taken. School authorities may also 14turn over such evidence to law enforcement authorities.15    (f) Suspension or expulsion may include suspension or 16expulsion from school and all school activities and a 17prohibition from being present on school grounds.18    (g) A school district may adopt a policy providing that if 19a student is suspended or expelled for any reason from any 20public or private school in this or any other state, the 21student must complete the entire term of the suspension or 22expulsion in an alternative school program under Article 13A 23of this Code or an alternative learning opportunities program 24under Article 13B of this Code before being admitted into the 25school district if there is no threat to the safety of students 26or staff in the alternative program. A school district that   SB0939 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 05246 LNS 15275 b1adopts a policy under this subsection (g) must include a 2provision allowing for consideration of any mitigating 3factors, including, but not limited to, a student's status as 4a parent, expectant parent, or victim of domestic or sexual 5violence, as defined in Article 26A. 6    (h) School officials shall not advise or encourage 7students to drop out voluntarily due to behavioral or academic 8difficulties.9    (i) In this subsection (i), "municipal code violation" 10means the violation of a rule or regulation established by a 11local government authority, authorized by Section 1-2-1 of the 12Illinois Municipal Code.13    A student must not be issued a monetary fine, fee, ticket, 14or citation as a school-based disciplinary consequence or for 15a municipal code violation on school grounds during school 16hours or while taking school transportation by any person, 17though this shall not preclude requiring a student to provide 18restitution for lost, stolen, or damaged property.19    This subsection (i) does not modify school disciplinary 20responses under this Section or Section 10-20.14 of this Code 21that existed before the effective date of this amendatory Act 22of the 104th General Assembly or responses to alleged 23delinquent or criminal conduct set forth in this Code, Article 24V of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, or the Criminal Code of 252012. This subsection (i) does not apply to violations of 26traffic, boating, or fish and game laws.   SB0939 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 05246 LNS 15275 b1    (j) Subsections (a) through (i) of this Section shall 2apply to elementary and secondary schools, charter schools, 3special charter districts, and school districts organized 4under Article 34 of this Code. 5    (k) Through June 30, 2026, the expulsion of students 6enrolled in programs funded under Section 1C-2 of this Code is 7subject to the requirements under paragraph (7) of subsection 8(a) of Section 2-3.71 of this Code.9    (k-5) On and after July 1, 2026, the expulsion of children 10enrolled in programs funded under Section 15-25 of the 11Department of Early Childhood Act is subject to the 12requirements of paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Section 1315-30 of the Department of Early Childhood Act. 14    (l) An in-school suspension program provided by a school 15district for any students in kindergarten through grade 12 may 16focus on promoting non-violent conflict resolution and 17positive interaction with other students and school personnel. 18A school district may employ a school social worker or a 19licensed mental health professional to oversee an in-school 20suspension program in kindergarten through grade 12.21(Source: P.A. 103-594, eff. 6-25-24; 103-896, eff. 8-9-24; 22104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-430, eff. 8-20-25.) 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.